Utah statutes.
4-15-5.   License -- Application -- Fees -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1) (a)  Application for a license to operate a nursery or nursery outlet or to solicit or receive orders of nursery stock for a person regularly engaged in the business of operating a nursery or nursery outlet shall be made to the department on forms prescribed and furnished by it.

(b)  Upon receipt of a proper application and compliance with applicable rules, and payment of a license fee determined by the department according to Subsection 4-2-2(2) for each place of business where the applicant intends to offer nursery stock for wholesale or retail sale, or the payment of a fee determined by the department pursuant to Subsection 4-2-2(2) in the case of an agent, the commissioner, if satisfied the convenience and necessity of the industry and the public will be served, shall issue a license to engage in the otherwise proscribed activity through December 31 of the year in which the license is issued, subject to suspension or revocation for cause.

(2)  A license to operate a nursery or nursery outlet or an agent's license is renewable on or before December 31 of each year for a period of one year upon the payment of an annual license renewal fee determined by the department according to Subsection 4-2-2(2).

